Mississippi, session 2026, SB3395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Melvin Jackson of Monroe County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector on August 20, 2001, as a result of his conviction in Lowndes County for false pretenses.  He was convicted of the crime of false pretenses, and on August 20, 2001, was sentenced to serve three (3) years probation in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. A search of the Mississippi Department of Corrections records did not produce a discharge affidavit, but Jackson has represented that he completed all terms and conditions of his sentence. The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.